West Virginia, session 2026, HB4618.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-815. Temporary increase in kinship payment subsidy. (a) Temporary increase in subsidy amount — Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, a kinship parent shall be eligible for a temporary increase in the subsidy amounts equal to that of the foster parent subsidy if at the time of initial placement, the following circumstances:(1) The kinship parent shall pass a background check, through the WV Cares Program, which shall be submitted within five days of the initial date of placement; (2) The kinship placement shall pass an initial home screening to identify and to correct fatal life safety issues; and (3) The kinship parent shall be assigned to a child placing agency to assist them with obtaining certification as a foster parent and compliance with all other aspects of certification.(b) Time frame for temporary increase — The temporary increase in subsidy amounts shall become payable to the kinship parent within 30 days of the initial kinship placement and will continue for a period of no more than six months at the temporary rate to allow the kinship parent to become certified.  If the kinship parent is unable or unwilling to become certified at the end of the six-month period, the temporary increase will be removed and is no longer payable.